Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-294.02
Appropriation; temporary transfer or change; renewal or extension.

A temporary transfer or a change in the type or purpose of use of an appropriation may be renewed or otherwise extended by the parties thereto at any time following the midpoint of the transfer or change term, but any such renewal or extension is subject to review and approval pursuant to sections 46-290 to 46-294. No renewal or extension shall cause the term of any such temporary transfer or change to exceed thirty years in duration from the date the renewal or extension is approved by the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 116.